North Dakota statutes. TITLE 65 Workforce Safety and Insurance
CHAPTER 65-04 The Fund and Premium Payments Thereto
65-04-25.
Service of nonresident employer in suit for premium or in suit against an uninsured employer.

If the employer in an action to collect delinquent premiums or for injuries sustained in the employer’s employment for which the employer did not carry the required insurance is a nonresident of this state, or a foreign corporation or limited liability company doing business in this state, service of the summons may be made upon any agent, representative, or foreman of the employer in this state, or in the case of a foreign corporation, its director, and if there is no agent, representative, or foreman, or in the case of a foreign corporation, director, upon whom service can be made in this state, service upon the secretary of state constitutes personal service upon that nonresident employer or corporation’s director who has either failed to secure the necessary coverage or who is delinquent in the employer’s premiums, or service may be made in any other manner designated by law. The organization may retain counsel who is licensed in another state to represent the organization on a contingent or hourly fee basis in any proceeding relating to the collection of amounts due the organization under this title. All attorney’s fees and costs incurred under this section are a charge to the general fund.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 8; 1921, ch. 144, § 1; 1923, ch. 349, § 1; 1925, ch. 226, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a8; S.L. 1931, ch. 315, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0425; S.L. 1955, ch. 354, § 9; 1957 Supp., § 65-0425; S.L. 1975, ch. 581, § 8; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2001, ch. 578, § 8; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2021, ch. 503, § 5, effective March 15, 2021.

Cross-References.

Service by publication, see N.D.R.Civ.P. 4(e).

65-04-26.
Lien priority and filing — Remedies available in action for delinquent premiums — Exemptions restricted.

The claim of the organization in bankruptcy, probate, insolvency, and receivership proceedings for premiums in default and penalties is a lien with the same priority as prior income tax liens, except that this lien is not enforceable against a purchaser, including a lien creditor, of real estate or personal property for valuable consideration without notice. Notice of this lien must be filed in the place and manner provided for in section 57-38-49. A certificate of the organization that premiums and penalties are due for the period stated in the certificate is prima facie evidence of this fact. In any action brought for the recovery of premiums in default and penalties, the remedies of garnishment or attachment, or both, are available. No exemptions except absolute exemptions under section 28-22-02 may be allowed against any levy under execution pursuant to judgment recovered in the action.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 8; 1921, ch. 144, § 1; 1923, ch. 349, § 1; 1925, ch. 226, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a8; S.L. 1931, ch. 315, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0426; S.L. 1959, ch. 419, § 1; 1985, ch. 687, § 1; 1993, ch. 625, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

Cross-References.

Absolute exemptions, see

N.D.C.C. § 28-22-02.

Attachment, see N.D.C.C. ch. 32-08.1.

Garnishment, see N.D.C.C. ch. 32-09.1.

65-04-26.1.
Corporate officer personal liability.

An officer or director of a corporation, or manager or governor of a limited liability company, or partner of a limited liability partnership, or employee of a corporation or limited liability company having twenty percent stock ownership who has control of or supervision over the filing of and responsibility for filing payroll reports or making payment of premiums or reimbursements under this title and who fails to file the reports or to make payments as required, is personally liable for premiums under this chapter and reimbursement under section 65-04-04.4, including interest, penalties, and costs if the corporation or limited liability company does not pay to the organization those amounts for which the corporation or limited liability company is liable.

The personal liability of any person as provided in this section survives dissolution, reorganization, bankruptcy, receivership, or assignment for the benefit of creditors. For the purposes of this section, all wages paid by the corporation or limited liability company must be considered earned from any person determined to be personally liable.

After review of the evidence in the employer’s file, the organization shall determine personal liability under this section. The organization shall issue a decision under this section pursuant to section 65-04-32.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 714, § 38; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 619, § 7; 2001, ch. 578, § 9; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2003, ch. 564, § 5; 2017, ch. 437, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 503, § 6, effective March 15, 2021.

65-04-26.2.
General contractor liability for subcontractors and independent contractors.

An individual employed by a subcontractor or by an independent contractor operating under an agreement with a general contractor is deemed to be an employee of the general contractor and any subcontractor that supplied work to the subcontractor or independent contractor. A general contractor and a subcontractor are liable for payment of premium and any applicable penalty for an employee of a subcontractor or independent contractor that does not secure required coverage or pay the premium owing. The general contractor and a subcontractor are liable for payment of this premium and penalty until the subcontractor or independent contractor pays this premium and penalty. The liability imposed on a general contractor and a subcontractor under this section for the payment of premium and penalties under this title which are not paid by a subcontractor or independent contractor is limited to work performed under that general contractor.

Upon request of the organization, a person the organization determines may have information that may assist the organization in determining the amount of wages expended by the subcontractor or independent contractor shall provide this information to the organization.

If the organization is unable to obtain complete and reliable payroll information for a subcontractor or independent contractor, the organization may calculate premium using the available payroll information of the subcontractor or independent contractor for work performed under the liable general contractor or a subcontractor as permitted in section 65-04-19. If a subcontractor’s or independent contractor’s liability for failure to secure coverage or pay the premium owing arises from a single project with a general contractor, the liability of the general contractor and subcontractor is one hundred percent of the amount of premium and penalty owed by the subcontractor or independent contractor. If there is evidence showing the subcontractor or independent contractor was working on multiple projects during the period the subcontractor or independent contractor failed to secure coverage, the organization shall set the amount of the general contractor and subcontractor’s liability which may not exceed seventy percent of the total premium and penalty owed by the subcontractor or independent contractor.

The definition of the term “contractor” under section 43-07-01 applies to this section.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 438, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 524, § 9, effective August 1, 2019.

65-04-27.
Payment of claims — Employers in default.

The payment of a judgment rendered in an action brought against an employer for the collection of defaulted premiums or the voluntary payment of the amount of premium, penalties, and costs prior to judgment entitles the employer and that employer’s employees to the benefits provided in this title from the date of the payment. The organization shall pay an employee who sustains an injury while working for an employer whose premium is in default the same as the employee would receive if the employee were working for an employer whose premium is not in default.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 8; 1921, ch. 144, § 1; 1923, ch. 349, § 1; 1925, ch. 226, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a8; S.L. 1931, ch. 315, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0427; S.L. 1955, ch. 354, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 65-0427; S.L. 1995, ch. 619, § 8; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-04-27.1.
Injunctive relief — Procedure.

To protect the lives, safety, and well-being of wageworkers, to ensure fair and equitable contributions to the workforce safety and insurance fund among all employers, and to protect the workforce safety and insurance fund, the organization may institute injunction proceedings in the name of the state of North Dakota against certain employers to prohibit them from employing others in those employments defined as hazardous by this title:

When it has been brought to the attention of the organization that the employer has unlawfully employed uninsured workers in violation of section 65-04-33;

When the employer defaults in the payment of insurance premiums, reimbursements, penalties, or interest into the fund; or

When the organization, in exercise of the authority granted it by section 65-03-01, finds that it is necessary to enjoin and restrain certain employers and employments to protect the lives and safety of the employees because of the employer’s failure or refusal to comply with necessary and proper safety rules.

The courts of this state have jurisdiction to grant preventive relief under the circumstances described in subdivision a.

Chapter 32-06 as it relates to injunction applies to proceedings instituted under this section to the extent that chapter is applicable.

In addition to chapter 32-06, when the court has granted an immediate temporary injunction at the time of the commencement of the action, the defendant employer may have a hearing by the court on the merits of the case without delay. Upon three days’ written notice to the organization, the court shall proceed to hearing on the merits and render its decision.

In addition to chapter 32-06, when the court has not granted an immediate temporary injunction at the time of the commencement of the action and the time for answer has expired, either party may have a hearing by the court on the merits of the case. Upon ten days’ notice by either party to the other, the court shall proceed to hearing on the merits and render its decision.

Any court of competent jurisdiction in this state shall impose a fine of at least one thousand dollars against an employer who has violated an injunction granted under this section. The court shall impose a fine for each violation, in addition to any other penalty provided by law.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 418, § 2; 1989, ch. 69, § 80; 1991, ch. 714, § 39; 1995, ch. 619, § 9; 2001, ch. 578, § 11; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-04-27.2.
Cease and desist order — Civil penalty.

If it appears to the organization an employer is without workers compensation coverage or is in an uninsured status in violation of this title, by registered mail the director may issue to the employer an order to cease and desist and a notice of opportunity for hearing. Within thirty days of receipt of the order, a party to the order may make a written request for a hearing. If a hearing is not requested, the order is final and may not be appealed. If a hearing is requested, the hearing must be conducted in accordance with chapter 28-32 to the extent that chapter does not conflict with this section and the order remains in effect until the hearing officer renders a decision. If an employer fails to appear at a hearing requested under this section, that employer defaults and the allegations contained in the cease and desist order are deemed true.

In addition to the penalties in section 65-04-33, a person that employs an individual in violation of a cease and desist order issued under this section is subject to a penalty of ten thousand dollars and to a penalty of one hundred dollars per day for each day the violation continues. The organization may reduce the penalties under this section.

A general contractor or a subcontractor that willfully uses the services of a subcontractor precluded from operating under a cease and desist order is subject to a penalty of five thousand dollars and one hundred dollars per day for each day the violation occurs. The organization shall provide notice to the general contractor or subcontractor by regular mail before assessing penalties under this section. The organization may reduce the penalties under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 438, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 524, § 10, effective August 1, 2019.

65-04-28.
Complying employers not liable for injuries to or deaths of employees — Common-law actions barred.

Employers who comply with the provisions of this chapter shall not be liable to respond in damages at common law or by statute for injury to or death of any employee, wherever occurring, during the period covered by the premiums paid into the fund.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 9; 1925 Supp., § 396a9; R.C. 1943, § 65-0428; S.L. 1949, ch. 354, § 4; 1957 Supp., § 65-0428.

65-04-29.
Employers carrying on nonhazardous employment may come under law — Employee’s option.

Any employer carrying on any employment not defined as hazardous under section 65-01-02 who complies with this title and who pays into the fund the premiums provided for under this chapter is covered under the fund and is not liable to respond in damages at common law or by statute for injuries to or the death of any employee, wherever occurring, during the period covered by such premiums. Any employee who elects before injury not to come under workforce safety and insurance may do so by notifying the organization and the employer of such election in writing.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 12; 1925 Supp., § 396a12; R.C. 1943, § 65-0429; S.L. 1959, ch. 420, § 1; 1989, ch. 69, § 81; 1991, ch. 714, § 40; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-04-30.
State treasurer is custodian of fund — Deposit — Disbursement on vouchers.

The state treasurer is the custodian of the fund and all payments of awards of the organization for disbursements other than travel and administrative expenses must be paid by the state treasurer upon warrant-checks authorized and prepared by the organization. Warrants drawn upon the fund and paid by the state treasurer must be returned to the organization and must be kept in the files of the organization. The organization shall submit to the office of management and budget once each month a monthly financial statement showing the receipts, disbursements, investments, and status of the fund. The treasurer may deposit any portion of the fund not needed for immediate use in the manner and subject to the requirements prescribed by law for the deposit by the treasurer of state funds. Any interest earned by any portion of the fund which is deposited by the state treasurer under this section must be collected by the state treasurer and placed to the credit of the fund.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 13; 1925 Supp., § 396a13; S.L. 1935, ch. 286, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 65-0430; S.L. 1965, ch. 181, § 32; 1999, ch. 113, § 23; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

Cross-References.

Deposit of state funds, see N.D.C.C. § 21-04-02.

Unemployment compensation fund, see N.D.C.C. ch. 52-03.

65-04-31.
Investment of fund.

Investment of the fund must be under the supervision of the state investment board in accordance with chapter 21-10. For purposes of this section, the director is the official signatory for the organization on any check, document, or other legal instrument relating to or resulting from the investment of organization funds.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 284, §§ 1, 2; 1937, ch. 189, §§ 1, 2; 1939, ch. 186, §§ 1, 3, 4; R.C. 1943, § 65-0431; S.L. 1947, ch. 376, § 1; 1957, ch. 181, § 6; 1957 Supp., § 65-0431; S.L. 1963, ch. 205, § 6; 1963, ch. 426, § 1; 1975, ch. 581, § 9; 1989, ch. 295, § 14; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

Cross-References.

Permission of industrial commission necessary for investment of public funds, see N.D.C.C. § 54-27-16.

65-04-32.
Decisions by organization — Disputed decisions.

Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in chapter 28-32, the following procedures apply when the organization issues a decision under this chapter or section 65-04-04.4:

The organization may issue a notice of decision based on an informal internal review of the record and shall serve notice of the decision on the parties by regular mail. The organization shall include with the decision a notice of the employer’s right to reconsideration.

An employer has forty-five days from the day the notice of decision was mailed to file a written petition for reconsideration. The employer is not required to file the request through an attorney. The request must state the reason for disagreement with the organization’s decision and the desired outcome. The request may be accompanied by additional evidence not previously submitted to the organization. The organization shall reconsider the matter by informal internal review of the information of record. Absent a timely and sufficient request for reconsideration, the notice of decision is final and may not be reheard or appealed.

After receiving a petition for reconsideration, unless settlement negotiations are ongoing, the organization shall serve on the parties by regular mail an administrative order including its findings of fact, conclusions of law, and order, in response to the petition for reconsideration. The organization may serve an administrative order on any decision made by informal internal review without first issuing a notice of decision and receiving a request for reconsideration. If the organization does not issue an order within sixty days of receiving a request for reconsideration, a party may request, and the organization shall promptly issue, an appealable determination.

A party has forty-five days from the date of service of an administrative order to file a written request for rehearing. The request must state specifically each alleged error of fact and law to be reheard and the relief sought. Absent a timely and sufficient request for rehearing, the administrative order is final and may not be reheard or appealed.

Rehearings must be conducted as hearings under chapter 28-32 to the extent that chapter does not conflict with this section.

An employer may appeal a posthearing administrative order to district court in accordance with chapter 65-10. Chapter 65-10 does not preclude the organization from appealing to district court a final order issued by a hearing officer under this title.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 578, § 10; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2003, ch. 564, § 6; 2009, ch. 611, § 10; 2011, ch. 507, § 3; 2011, ch. 512, § 2; 2017, ch. 437, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 524, § 11, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 502, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 3 of chapter 502, S.L. 2021 provides, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to all claims, regardless of date of injury, which have a notice of decision issued after July 31, 2021.

Cross-References.

Administrative rehearing, see

N.D.C.C. § 28-32-40.

65-04-33.
Intentional acts — Failure to secure coverage — Uninsured — Noncompliance — Failure to submit necessary reports — Penalty.

An employer may not employ any person, or receive the fruits of the labor of any person, in a hazardous employment as defined in this title, without first applying for workforce safety and insurance coverage for the protection of employees by notifying the organization of the intended employment, the nature of the intended employment, and the estimated payroll expenditure for the coming twelve-month period.

An employer that willfully misrepresents to the organization or its representative, by statement or omission, the amount of payroll upon which a premium under this title is based, or that willfully fails to secure coverage for employees, is liable to the state in the amount of five thousand dollars plus three times the difference between the premium paid and the amount of premium the employer should have paid.

The organization shall collect a penalty imposed under this subsection in a civil action in the name of the state, and the organization shall deposit a penalty collected under this subsection to the credit of the workforce safety and insurance fund.

An employer that willfully misrepresents to the organization or its representative, by statement or omission, the amount of payroll upon which a premium under this title is based, or that willfully fails to secure coverage for employees, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. If the premium due exceeds one thousand dollars, the penalty for willful failure to secure coverage or willful misrepresentation to the organization or its representative is a class C felony. If the employer is a corporation or a limited liability company, the president, secretary, treasurer, or person with primary responsibility is liable for the failure to secure workforce safety and insurance coverage under this subsection.

In addition to the penalties prescribed by this subsection, the organization may initiate injunction proceedings as provided for in this title to enjoin an employer from unlawfully employing uninsured workers.

The cost of an investigation under this subsection which results in a criminal conviction may be charged to the employer’s account and collected by civil action.

An employer that willfully makes a false statement or fails to make a statement in an attempt to preclude an injured worker from securing benefits or payment for services, or that willfully discharges or threatens to discharge an employee for seeking or making known the intention to seek workforce safety and insurance benefits is liable to the state in the amount of five thousand dollars. The organization shall collect a civil penalty imposed under this section in a civil action in the name of the state, and the organization shall deposit a penalty collected under this section to the credit of the workforce safety and insurance fund. A willful violation of this section is a class A misdemeanor. The cost of an investigation under this subsection which results in a criminal conviction may be charged to the employer’s account and collected by civil action.

An employer that is uninsured for failure to secure coverage is liable for any premiums, assessments plus penalties and interest due on those premiums, plus a penalty of twenty-five percent of all premiums due during the most recent year of failure to secure coverage.

An additional five percent penalty is due for each year of failure to secure coverage before the most recent year beginning on the date the organization became aware of the employer’s failure to secure coverage, resulting in the penalty for the second most recent year being thirty percent, for the third most recent year being thirty-five percent, for the fourth most recent year being forty percent, for the fifth most recent year being forty-five percent, and for the sixth most recent year being fifty percent.

In addition, the organization may assess a penalty of up to five thousand dollars for each premium period the employer failed to secure coverage. The organization may not assess a penalty for more than six years of failure to secure coverage.

The organization may assess an employer the actual cost and reserves of any claim attributable to the employer during the time the employer failed to secure coverage.

The penalties for employers are in addition to any other penalties by law. The organization may reduce the penalties provided for under this section. An employer may not appeal an organization decision not to reduce a penalty under this subsection.

An employer in noncompliance is subject to a penalty of up to five thousand dollars for each premium period the employer was in noncompliance.

The organization may not assess a penalty for more than six years of past noncompliance.

The organization may reduce the penalties provided for under this section. An employer may not appeal an organization decision not to reduce a penalty under this subsection.

An employer that fails or refuses to furnish to the organization the payroll report or estimate, or that fails or refuses to furnish other information required by the organization under this chapter is subject to a penalty established by the organization of up to five thousand dollars.

Upon the request of the organization, the employer shall furnish the organization any of that employer’s payroll records, payroll reports, and other information required by the organization under this chapter and an estimate of payroll for the advance premium year.

If the employer fails or refuses to provide the records within thirty days of a written request from the organization, the employer is subject to a penalty of five thousand dollars and a penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars for each day until the organization receives the records.

The organization may not assess a penalty that exceeds one hundred fifty dollars under this subsection against an organized township.

The organization may reduce penalties for employers under this subsection. However, an employer may not appeal an organization decision not to reduce a penalty.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 578, § 12; 2003, ch. 508, § 3; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2003, ch. 564, § 7; 2003, ch. 566, § 1; 2005, ch. 606, § 2; 2005, ch. 607, § 3; 2013, ch. 502, § 3; 2015, ch. 484, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 437, § 5, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 524, § 12, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 500, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 13 of chapter 500, S.L. 2021 provides, “

APPLICATION.

Sections 1, 2, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12 of this Act apply to all claims regardless of date of injury. Section 4 of this Act applies to all payroll periods of employer accounts regardless of the date of the statement or omission and applies to all claims regardless of the date of injury.”

Cross-References.

Absolute exemptions, see

N.D.C.C. § 28-22-02.